Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5994.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 42-17.1 of the General Laws entitled "Department of Environmental
Management" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
42-17.1-2.6. Restricted receipt account.
There is hereby established within the general fund of the state a restricted receipt account
entitled or to be known as the “environmental law enforcement on federal property and boating
accidents account”. The account shall be housed within the budget of the department of
environmental management and shall be utilized to achieve compliance with federal law for
environmental law enforcement on federal property and to respond to boating accidents. Revenue
generated from agricultural programs administered by the department shall be deposited in the
restricted receipt account established pursuant to the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. Chapter 42-17.9 of the General Laws entitled "Preservation of State Open
Space" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
42-17.9-7.1. Department of environmental management to maintain list of projects.
(a) The department of environmental management shall develop, identify, maintain and
continuously update a list of projects that qualify for forest and open space land conservation
funding pursuant to the federal Agricultural Act of 2014, P.L 113-79 (2014), the federal
Agricultural Improvement Act of 2018, P.L 115-334 (2018) and the federal 2022 Inflation
Reduction Act, P.L 117-169.

SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001551
========
LC001551 - Page 2 of 3